Missouri, session 2026, HB3369.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 82, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 82.1070, to read as follows:
82.1070. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Application", any application, request, filing, or submission, whether
complete or incomplete, formal or informal;
(2) "Data center", a building, group of buildings, or facility whose purpose is
data processing, distribution, or data storage, and is used to house computer systems,
servers, and associated components including, but not limited to, central processing
units, graphical processing units, neural networks, quantum bits, quantum processors,
memory, data routing, data storage, data warehouses, server farms, bitcoin mining,
crypto processing, virtual private networks, virtual servers, artificial intelligence
training or processing, image processing, cloud computing, email servicing, a telecom
hotel, telehouse colocation, or any other term applicable to facilities which are used for
such purposes.
2. The acceptance, processing, or approval of any application that would allow
for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, or alteration of facilities for the
creation or expansion of data centers shall be paused until August 28, 2027.
Applications submitted before August 28, 2026, shall not be affected by such pause
and shall proceed under established procedures.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3369 2
3. The pause provided for in subsection 2 shall apply only to departments,
divisions, boards, commissions, councils, and agencies in a city not within a county.
✔